Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1172
Livestock Auction Market Fund; creation; use; investment.

Salaries and expenses of employees, costs of hearings, and all other costs of the board in the administration of the Livestock Auction Market Act shall be paid from the Livestock Auction Market Fund which is hereby created. Any money in the Livestock Auction Market Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 16, p. 969;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 71;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 15.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.